Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 5,576,273
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 1,805,571
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 118,156
(4) For debt service ........................ $ 1,017,323
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under section 1, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 140), to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs, for the following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 5,846,015
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 6,904,151
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 118,156
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$100,457,558 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond  Sinking Account, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 1
eral funds, collected or received by the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs for administration,
grants and services supplied to veterans.
(2) This section does not limit expenditures from the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking
Account for purposes described in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $500,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures  by the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for the following purposes are not limited:
(1) Debt service;
(2) Professional services and related costs associated directly with bond sales;
(3) Loans to veterans; and
(4) Payments on behalf of borrowers for property  taxes, city liens, fire insurance, mort-
gage cancellation  insurance and repairs to and miscellaneous charges for borrower-owned
property that are  charged to the loan account and repaid along with the payment of loan
interest and principal.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 2